Wisconsin, session 2025, AB903.
do enact as follows:AB903,1Section 1. 48.14 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:48.14 (2) (a) For a minor, where parental rights have been terminated under subch. VIII; or.AB903,2Section 2. 48.14 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:48.14 (2) (b) The appointment and removal of a guardian of the person for a child under ss. 48.427, 48.43, 48.831, 48.832, 48.839 (4) (a), 48.977, and 48.978, and for a child found to be in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 because the child is without parent or guardian or because custody of the child has been relinquished under s. 48.195.AB903,3Section 3. 48.185 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:48.185 (2) Guardianship and termination of parental rights proceedings. In an action under s. 48.41, venue shall be in the county where the birth parent or child resides at the time that the petition is filed. Subject to sub. (5), venue for any proceeding under s. 48.977 or any proceeding under subch. VIII when the child has been placed outside the home pursuant to a dispositional order under s. 48.345 or 48.347, shall be in the county where the dispositional order was issued, unless the child’s county of residence has changed or the parent of the child has resided in a different county of this state for 6 months. In either case, the Venue for any proceeding under s. 48.13 (2m) concerning a child whose custody has been relinquished under s. 48.195 shall be in the county in which the relinquishment occurred. Notwithstanding the venue specified in this subsection, the court may, upon a motion and for good cause shown, transfer the case any action or proceeding specified in this subsection, along with all appropriate records, to the county of residence of the child or parent.AB903,4Section 4. 48.417 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:48.417 (1m) Relinquished child; when petition required. If the court has found that a parent of the child has relinquished custody of the child as described in s. 48.13 (2m), the district attorney, corporation counsel, or other appropriate official designated under s. 48.09 of the county in which the relinquishment occurred shall file a petition under s. 48.42 (1) to terminate the parental rights of the parent or parents of the child or, if a petition under s. 48.42 (1) to terminate those parental rights has already been filed, shall join in the petition no earlier than 30 days after the date on which the child was relinquished and no later than 60 days after the date on which the court found that the child was relinquished, as described in s. 48.13 (2m).AB903,5Section 5. Initial applicability.(1) Termination of parental rights of newborn child whose custody has been relinquished. This act first applies to a child whose custody is relinquished, as described in s. 48.195, on the effective date of this subsection.AB903,6Section 6. Effective date.(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 6th month beginning after publication. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab903 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab903 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB903 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB903 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB903: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting